District of Columbia statutes.
1-1031.01

“Non-English speaking person” defined.

As used in this section, the term “non-English speaking person” shall mean a person whose native speaking language is a language other than English, and who continues to use his or her native language as his or her primary means of oral and written communication.

History

Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title IV, §§ 402, 403, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, §§ 2(q), 6, 29 DCR 458

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1309(a).
1973 Ed., § 1-1105c.